Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-925.03
Sewers; rental charges; reduction in taxes.

The revenue from rental charges under section 17-925.02 shall only be used for the abatement or the reduction of ad valorem taxes being levied or to be levied for the payment of bonds outstanding or to be issued for the construction of or additions to the sewerage system described in section 17-925.02.

Laws 1947, c. 43, § 2, p. 159;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 263.